Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1361.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 18, 2016 (P.L.128, No.17), known as the Pennsylvania ABLE Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 703. Exclusion of contributions for purposes of determining need for disabled veterans' real estate tax exemption.A contribution made during a calendar year to an ABLE savings account may not be considered annual income or otherwise considered in determining need for an exemption under 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 89 (relating to disabled veterans' real estate tax 123456789101112131415161718192021 exemption) or regulations promulgated under 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 89.Section 2. The addition of section 703 of the act shall apply to a determination of need under 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 89 made on or after January 1, 2027.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1361PN1783 - 2 - 12345